South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Act 111 of 2024 is repealed. SECTION 2.  The statutes contained in Act 111 of 2024 revert to language contained in them prior to March 7, 2024. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----